Mississippi, session 2026, HB4158.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Cassidy Alexander of Lamar County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of her conviction for the crime of Forgery and Vehicle Theft in Lowndes and Lauderdale County, on December 5, and December 11, 2003, for which she was sentenced to serve three (3) years and two (2) years to run concurrently in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  She was released on April 19, 2005, and discharged on August 19, 2005.  On May 23, 2008, she was sentenced to five (5) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. She was released on March 19, 2009, and discharged on June 11, 2012.  The Legislature is informed that she has since conducted herself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.